Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB730.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5421(a) of Title 20 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5421. Applicability.(a) General rule.--This chapter applies to advance health care directives [and], out-of-hospital nonresuscitation orders and Pennsylvania orders for life-sustaining treatment.* * *Section 2. The definitions of "health care provider," "medical command physician," "order" and "patient" in section 5422 of Title 20 are amended and the section is amended by 123456789101112131415161718192021 adding definitions to read:§ 5422. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Health care provider." A person who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized by the laws of this Commonwealth to administer or provide health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession. The term includes personnel recognized under [the act of July 3, 1985 (P.L.164, No.45), known as the Emergency Medical Services Act.] 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 81 (relating to emergency medical services system) and those individuals recognized under 42 Pa.C.S. § 8331.2 (relating to good Samaritan civil immunity for use of automated external defibrillator).* * *"Medical command physician." A licensed physician who is authorized to give a medical command under [the act of July 3, 1985 (P.L.164, No.45), known as the Emergency Medical Services Act] 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 81 (relating to emergency medical services system).* * *"Order." An out-of-hospital do-not-resuscitate order as defined under section 5483 (relating to definitions) or Pennsylvania orders for life-sustaining treatment as defined under section 5493 (relating to definitions)."Out-of-hospital do-not-resuscitate order" or "OOH-DNR order." An out-of-hospital do-not-resuscitate order as defined under section 5483 (relating to definitions).20250SB0730PN1799 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ["Patient." An out-of-hospital do-not-resuscitate patient as defined under section 5483 (relating to definitions).]"Pennsylvania orders for life-sustaining treatment" or "POLST." Pennsylvania orders for life-sustaining treatment as defined under section 5493 (relating to definitions).* * *Section 3. Sections 5432, 5445(b), 5483, 5484 heading, (a) and (b), 5485, 5486 and 5487 of Title 20 are amended to read:§ 5432. Criminal penalties.(a) Criminal homicide.--A person shall be subject to prosecution for criminal homicide as provided in 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 25 (relating to criminal homicide) if the person intends to cause the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining treatment contrary to the wishes of the principal or patient and, because of that action, directly causes life-sustaining treatment to be withheld or withdrawn and death to be hastened and:(1) falsifies or forges the advance health care directive, OOH-DNR order, bracelet [or], necklace or POLST of that principal or patient; or(2) willfully conceals or withholds personal knowledge of a revocation of an advance health care directive or DNR status.(b) Interference with health care directive.--A person commits a felony of the third degree if that person willfully:(1) conceals, cancels, alters, defaces, obliterates or damages an advance health care directive, OOH-DNR order, bracelet [or], necklace or POLST without the consent of the principal or patient;(2) causes a person to execute an advance health care directive or order or wear a bracelet or necklace by undue 20250SB0730PN1799 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 influence, fraud or duress; or(3) falsifies or forges an advance health care directive, OOH-DNR order, bracelet [or], necklace or POLST or any amendment or revocation thereof, the result of which is a direct change in the health care provided to the principal or patient.§ 5445. Emergency medical services.* * *(b) Applicability.--This section is applicable only in those instances where an out-of-hospital DNR order is not in effect under section 5484 (relating to OOH-DNR orders, bracelets and necklaces).§ 5483. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Emergency medical services provider." [A health care provider recognized under the act of July 3, 1985 (P.L.164, No.45), known as the Emergency Medical Services Act.] As defined under 35 Pa.C.S. § 8103 (relating to definitions). The term includes those individuals recognized under 42 Pa.C.S. § 8331.2 (relating to good Samaritan civil immunity for use of automated external defibrillator)."EMS." Emergency medical services."Health care provider." A person who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized by the laws of this Commonwealth to administer or provide health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession. The term includes personnel recognized under [the act of July 3, 1985 (P.L.164, 20250SB0730PN1799 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 No.45), known as the Emergency Medical Services Act,] 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 81 (relating to emergency medical services system) and those individuals recognized under 42 Pa.C.S. § 8331.2 (relating to good Samaritan civil immunity for use of automated external defibrillator)."Out-of-hospital do-not-resuscitate bracelet." A bracelet in the standard format set forth in section 5484 (relating to OOH-DNR orders, bracelets and necklaces), supplied by the department and issued by the attending physician, which may be worn at the patient's option to notify emergency medical services providers of the presence of an OOH-DNR order."Out-of-hospital do-not-resuscitate necklace." A necklace in the standard format set forth in section 5484 (relating to OOH-DNR orders, bracelets and necklaces), supplied by the department and issued by the attending physician, which may be worn at the patient's option to notify emergency medical services providers of the presence of an OOH-DNR order."Out-of-hospital do-not-resuscitate order[.]" or "OOH-DNR order." An order in the standard format set forth in section 5484 (relating to OOH-DNR orders, bracelets and necklaces), supplied by the department and issued by the attending physician, directing emergency medical services providers to withhold cardiopulmonary resuscitation from the patient in the event of respiratory or cardiac arrest."Out-of-hospital do-not-resuscitate patient." An individual who:(1) Has an end-stage medical condition or is permanently unconscious.(2) Pursuant to section 5484(a) (relating to OOH-DNR orders, bracelets and necklaces), possesses and in any manner 20250SB0730PN1799 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 displays or causes to be displayed for emergency medical services providers an apparently valid OOH-DNR order, bracelet or necklace."Surrogate." A health care agent or a health care representative.§ 5484. [Orders] OOH-DNR orders, bracelets and necklaces.(a) Issuance.--An attending physician, upon the request of a patient who is at least 18 years of age, has graduated from high school, has married or is an emancipated minor, or the patient's surrogate if the surrogate is so authorized, shall issue to the patient an OOH-DNR order and may issue at the request of the patient or the patient's surrogate a bracelet or necklace supplied by the department. The patient may, at the patient's option, wear the bracelet or display the order or necklace to notify emergency medical services providers of the patient's DNR status.(b) Format of OOH-DNR order.--The department shall, with the advice of the Pennsylvania Emergency Health Services Council and with the assistance of the regional emergency medical services councils, make available standard OOH-DNR orders for issuance to patients by attending physicians of this Commonwealth. The form of the order shall contain, but not be limited to, the following:PENNSYLVANIA OUT-OF-HOSPITALDO-NOT-RESUSCITATE ORDERPatient's full legal name:I, the undersigned, state that I am the attending physician of the patient named above. The above-named patient or the patient's surrogate has requested this order, and I have made the determination that the patient is eligible for 20250SB0730PN1799 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an order and satisfies one of the following:.......... has an end-stage medical condition........... is permanently unconscious and has a living will directing that no cardiopulmonary resuscitation be provided to the patient in the event of the patient's cardiac or respiratory arrest.I direct any and all emergency medical services personnel, commencing on the effective date of this order, to withhold cardiopulmonary resuscitation (cardiac compression, invasive airway techniques, artificial ventilation, defibrillation and other related procedures) from the patient in the event of the patient's respiratory or cardiac arrest. I further direct such personnel to provide to the patient other medical interventions, such as intravenous fluids, oxygen or other therapies necessary to provide comfort care or to alleviate pain, unless directed otherwise by the patient or the emergency medical services provider's authorized medical command physician.Signature of attending physician:Printed name of attending physician:Dated:Attending physician's emergency telephone number:I, the undersigned, hereby direct that in the event of my cardiac and/or respiratory arrest efforts at cardiopulmonary resuscitation not be initiated and that they may be withdrawn if initiated. I understand that I may revoke these directions at any time by giving verbal instructions to the emergency medical services providers, by physical cancellation or destruction of this form or my bracelet or necklace or by simply not displaying this form or the bracelet or necklace 20250SB0730PN1799 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for my EMS [caregivers] providers.Signature of patient (if capable of making informed decisions):I, the undersigned, hereby certify that I am authorized to execute this order on the patient's behalf by virtue of having been designated as the patient's surrogate and/or by virtue of my relationship to the patient (specify relationship: ..........). I hereby direct that in the event of the patient's cardiac and/or respiratory arrest efforts at cardiopulmonary resuscitation not be initiated and be withdrawn if initiated.Signature of surrogate (if patient is incapable of making informed decisions):* * *§ 5485. Revocation.(a) Patient.--If a patient has obtained an OOH-DNR order, only the patient may revoke the patient's DNR status.(b) Surrogate.--If a surrogate has obtained an OOH-DNR order, the patient or the surrogate may revoke a patient's status.(c) Manner.--Revocation under this section may be done at any time without regard to the patient's physical or mental condition and in any manner, including verbally or by destroying or not displaying the OOH-DNR order, bracelet or necklace.§ 5486. Absence of OOH-DNR order, bracelet or necklace.If an OOH-DNR order has not been issued by an attending physician, a presumption does not arise as to the intent of the individual to consent to or to refuse the initiation, continuation or termination of life-sustaining treatment.§ 5487. Emergency medical services.20250SB0730PN1799 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Medical command instructions.--Notwithstanding the absence of an OOH-DNR order, bracelet or necklace pursuant to this section, emergency medical services providers shall at all times comply with the instructions of an authorized medical command physician to withhold or discontinue resuscitation.(b) Effect of OOH-DNR order, bracelet or necklace.--(1) Emergency medical services providers are authorized to and shall comply with an OOH-DNR order if made aware of the order by examining a bracelet, a necklace or the order itself.(2) Emergency medical services providers shall provide other medical interventions necessary and appropriate to provide comfort and alleviate pain, including intravenous fluids, medications, oxygen and any other intervention appropriate to the level of the certification of the provider, unless otherwise directed by the patient or the emergency medical services provider's authorized medical command physician.(3) As used in this subsection, the term "comply" means:(i) to withhold cardiopulmonary resuscitation from the patient in the event of respiratory or cardiac arrest; or(ii) to discontinue and cease cardiopulmonary resuscitation in the event the emergency medical services provider is presented with an OOH-DNR order or discovers a necklace or bracelet after initiating cardiopulmonary resuscitation.(c) Uncertainty regarding validity or applicability of OOH-DNR order, bracelet or necklace.--(1) Emergency medical services providers who in good 20250SB0730PN1799 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 faith are uncertain about the validity or applicability of an OOH-DNR order, bracelet or necklace shall render care in accordance with their level of certification.(2) Emergency medical services providers who act under paragraph (1) shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability or administrative sanction for failure to comply with an OOH-DNR order under this section.(d) Recognition of other states' orders.--Emergency medical services or [out-of-hospital DNR] OOH-DNR orders, bracelets or necklaces valid in states other than this Commonwealth shall be recognized in this Commonwealth to the extent that these orders, bracelets or necklaces and the criteria for their issuance are consistent with the laws of this Commonwealth. Emergency medical services providers shall act in accordance with the provisions of this section when encountering a patient with an apparently valid EMS or out-of-hospital DNR form, bracelet or necklace issued by another state. Emergency medical services providers acting in good faith under this section shall be entitled to the same immunities and protections that would otherwise be applicable.Section 4. Section 5488 of Title 20 is repealed:[§ 5488. Advisory committee.(a) Establishment.--Within 60 days of the effective date of this section, the department shall establish a committee to assist it in determining the advisability of using a standardized form containing orders by qualified physicians that detail the scope of medical treatment for patients' life-sustaining wishes.(b) Membership.--The committee shall include representatives from the Pennsylvania Medical Society, the Hospital and Health 20250SB0730PN1799 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 System Association of Pennsylvania, the Joint State Government Commission's Advisory Committee on Decedents' Estates Laws, the Pennsylvania Bar Association, the Department of Aging, the Department of Public Welfare and other interested persons at the department's discretion.(c) Scope of review.--The committee's review shall include, but not be limited to, examination of the following:(1) The need to adopt this type of standardized form in view of the existing use of do-not-resuscitate orders.(2) The use and evaluation of use of such forms in other states.(3) Any other matters determined by the department to be relevant to its determination.]Section 5. Title 20 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5489. Discontinuance. An OOH-DNR order may not be executed on or after the date the department adopts an initial POLST form under section 5498 (relating to POLST form). This subchapter shall continue to apply to any OOH-DNR order executed prior to the date the department adopts an initial POLST form. Previously executed OOH-DNR orders, bracelets and necklaces may continue to be recognized as valid.(A) WHEN OOH-DNR ORDER MAY NOT BE EXECUTED.--EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C), AN OOH-DNR ORDER MAY NOT BE EXECUTED ON OR AFTER THE DATE THE DEPARTMENT ADOPTS AN INITIAL POLST FORM UNDER SECTION 5498 (RELATING TO POLST FORM).(B) APPLICABILITY AND VALIDITY.--THIS SUBCHAPTER SHALL CONTINUE TO APPLY TO ANY OOH-DNR ORDER EXECUTED PRIOR TO THE DATE THE DEPARTMENT ADOPTS AN INITIAL POLST FORM. PREVIOUSLY EXECUTED OOH-DNR ORDERS, BRACELETS AND NECKLACES MAY CONTINUE TO 20250SB0730PN1799 - 11 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 BE RECOGNIZED AS VALID.(C) PRESUMPTION OF VALIDITY.--NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (A), AN OOH-DNR ORDER EXECUTED WITHIN ONE YEAR AFTER THE DATE THE DEPARTMENT ADOPTS AN INITIAL POLST FORM SHALL BE PRESUMED VALID IF EXECUTED IN GOOD FAITH AND IN SUBSTANTIAL COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS APPLICABLE TO OOH-DNR ORDERS PRIOR TO THE ADOPTION OF THE INITIAL POLST FORM. THE PRESUMPTION MAY BE REBUTTED BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT THE ORDER DOES NOT REFLECT THE WISHES OF THE INDIVIDUAL OR WAS NOT PROPERLY EXECUTED.Section 6. Chapter 54 of Title 20 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER FPENNSYLVANIA ORDERS FOR LIFE-SUSTAINING TREATMENTSec.5491. Scope of subchapter.5492. Legislative findings and intent.5493. Definitions.5494. Prohibitions on use ELIGIBILITY . 5495. Voluntary consent requirement.5496. POLST Advisory Committee.5497. Administration of POLST program.5498. POLST form.5498.1. Education about POLST.5498.2. Requirements for valid POLST.5498.3. Portability.5498.4. Team care.5498.5. Copies of orders.5498.6. Signature options.5498.7. Standards for surrogate decision makers.20250SB0730PN1799 - 12 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 5498.8. Revocation.5498.9. Transfer requirements.5498.10. Review requirements.5498.11. Compliance.5498.12. Emergency medical services.5498.13. Immunity.5498.14. Conflict with advance health care directive.5498.15. POLST executed under prior POLST form.5498.16. POLST executed under PLSWC form.5498.17. POLST executed in another state or jurisdiction.5498.18. POLST registry study.§ 5491. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter relates to Pennsylvania Orders for Life-Sustaining Treatment.§ 5492. Legislative findings and intent. The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) All individuals have a qualified right to control THE RIGHT TO MAKE DECISIONS REGARDING their health care and should not lose that right if they become incompetent or have never been a competent adult.(2) The Commonwealth has recognized this right by providing for advance health care directives in which individuals may provide direction and state their goals and preferences about future health care and by providing for surrogate decision makers for incompetent adults and unemancipated minors.(3) A Pennsylvania order for life-sustaining treatment, or POLST, differs from an advance health care directive as it converts an individual's wishes regarding health care into a medical order that is immediately actionable and applicable 20250SB0730PN1799 - 13 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 across all health care settings.(4) The use of POLST may overcome many of the limitations and problems associated with advance health care directives and existing orders regarding cardiopulmonary resuscitation and other end-of-life care, including out-of-hospital do-not-resuscitate orders.(5) In many cases, advance health care directives only name a surrogate decision maker to make health care decisions for the principal or lack specificity as to the principal's goals and preferences for a medical condition that subsequently develops because the medical condition was not foreseen by the principal.(6) Existing medical orders frequently are ineffective when the patient is transferred from one care setting to another because the procedures, forms and requirements at each care setting may be different, resulting in a loss in the ability of patients to have their wishes honored.(7) Existing emergency medical services protocols may require emergency medical services personnel to proceed to cardiopulmonary resuscitation when an individual is found in cardiac and respiratory arrest, even if the individual has completed an advance directive or has otherwise clearly indicated that the individual does not wish to receive cardiopulmonary resuscitation.(8) A POLST, which is executed by a health care practitioner under appropriate circumstances to implement the wishes of the patient expressed directly by the patient or through a surrogate decision maker, provides clear direction for the patient's care regarding health care issues likely to emerge given the patient's current medical condition.20250SB0730PN1799 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) A key step in the POLST process is the health care practitioner's review with the patient or the patient's surrogate decision maker of the patient's current health status, diagnoses and prognosis to determine whether a POLST order would be appropriate or should be updated.(10) The POLST decision-making process and medical orders are intended for patients who are considered to be at risk for a life-threatening clinical event because they have a serious life-limiting medical condition, which may include advanced frailty.(11) Among vulnerable populations, including persons with disabilities, a POLST is appropriate for seriously ill or frail patients if their health care practitioner would not be surprised if they died within the next year.(12) A POLST is not recommended for individuals with stable, even chronic, medical conditions with years of life expectancy.(13) It should not be assumed that all patients in any facility, including a nursing home, should have or would desire a POLST.(14) The well-being of the patient is paramount in considering a POLST, not cost savings to the government or insurers.(15) A POLST is appropriately entered following a shared decision-making process that facilitates patient consent that is voluntary, educated, collaborative and thoughtful, including a discussion of the patient's current clinical status, treatment options and likely outcomes, together with the patient's goals of care, preferences and values.(16) Conversations about a POLST must avoid any bias 20250SB0730PN1799 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 against continuation of care and must not characterize the continuation of life as burdensome. When appropriate, these conversations should emphasize palliative care and hospice availability.(17) A standardized POLST form, which is easily recognized, understood and implemented, can greatly advance the ability of patients to ensure that their medical care is aligned with their goals of care, preferences and values, as informed by a shared decision-making process.(18) Advance health care directives remain critically important for adults from the age of majority until death. An advance health care directive, rather than a POLST, is the appropriate advance care planning tool for healthy patients.(19) When the use of a POLST becomes appropriate, an existing advance health care directive will help shape the choices of the patient or the patient's surrogate decision maker when discussing a POLST with a health care provider. (20) This subchapter is intended to provide a framework and legal authority for a POLST to be valid and portable across all care settings, consistent with the foregoing findings.§ 5493. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:" Committee." The POLST Advisory Committee established under this subchapter."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Health care facility." Any of the following:(1) A facility that is licensed as a health care 20250SB0730PN1799 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility by the department under Chapter 8 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, including a hospital, long-term care facility, home health care agency or hospice.(2) A facility that is licensed or approved by the Department of Human Services under Article IX or X of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, and provides health care services, including a psychiatric facility or intermediate care facility for the developmentally or intellectually disabled.(3) A facility that is licensed as a prescribed pediatric extended care center by the department under the act of November 24, 1999 (P.L.884, No.54), known as the Prescribed Pediatric Extended Care Centers Act."Health care insurer." A person, corporation or other entity that offers administrative, indemnity or payment services under a program of health care or disability benefits, including the following:(1) An insurance company, association, exchange or fraternal benefit society subject to the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(2) A health maintenance organization subject to the act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) A hospital plan corporation subject to 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations).(4) A professional health service corporation subject to 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).20250SB0730PN1799 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) A self-insured employee welfare benefit plan. (6) A third-party administrator of a self-insured employee welfare benefit plan.(7) A Federal, State or local government sponsored or operated program."Health care practitioner." A physician, physician assistant or certified registered nurse practitioner acting in accordance with applicable law, including respective licensing acts and regulations."Health care provider." As defined in section 5483 (relating to definitions)."LIFE-LIMITING AND IRREVERSIBLE CONDITION." A CONTINUAL PROFOUND COMATOSE STATE WITH NO REASONABLE CHANCE OF RECOVERY OR A CONDITION CAUSED BY INJURY, DISEASE OR ILLNESS WHICH WITHIN A PHYSICIAN'S REASONABLE MEDICAL JUDGMENT WOULD USUALLY PRODUCE DEATH WITHIN ONE YEAR."Patient Life-Sustaining Wishes Committee." The committee appointed to assist the department in determining the advisability of using a standardized form containing orders by qualified physicians that detail the scope of medical treatment for patients' life-sustaining wishes under former section 5488 (relating to advisory committee)."Pennsylvania orders for life-sustaining treatment" or "POLST." One or more medical orders, issued for the care of an individual, regarding cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other medical interventions that are entered in accordance with section 5498.2 (relating to requirements for valid POLST)."PLSWC form." The form for a POLST previously approved by the department on the recommendation of the Patient Life- Sustaining Wishes Committee.20250SB0730PN1799 - 18 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "POLST form." The form for a POLST adopted under section 5498 (relating to POLST form)."Secretary." The Secretary of Health of the Commonwealth."Surrogate decision maker." A health care agent, health care representative, guardian of the person or parent of a minor who is legally authorized to make a health care decision for a patient.§ 5494. Prohibitions on use.(a) Stable medical conditions.--A POLST is not recommended for individuals with stable, even if chronic, medical conditions and years of life expectancy.(b) Construction.-- Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to advance or support euthanasia, suicide or health care practitioner-assisted suicide.§ 5494. ELIGIBILITY.(A) LIFE-LIMITING AND IRREVERSIBLE CONDITION.--A POLST FOR AN INDIVIDUAL MAY ONLY BE COMPLETED AFTER A PHYSICIAN HAS DETERMINED, WITHIN REASONABLE MEDICAL JUDGMENT, AND HAS CONFIRMED IN WRITING, THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS A PERSON WHO HAS A DIAGNOSED LIFE-LIMITING AND IRREVERSIBLE CONDITION AND THAT THE INDIVIDUAL'S THEN-CURRENT HEALTH STATUS, DIAGNOSIS AND PROGNOSIS INDICATE THAT STANDING MEDICAL ORDERS CONCERNING TREATMENT OPTIONS ARE APPROPRIATE.(B) PROGRESSION OF ILLNESS OR CONDITION.--A POLST MAY NOT BE COMPLETED FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A STABLE, EVEN IF CHRONIC, MEDICAL CONDITION UNLESS, WITHIN THE PHYSICIAN'S REASONABLE MEDICAL JUDGMENT, THE INDIVIDUAL'S ILLNESS OR CONDITION HAS PROGRESSED SUCH THAT MORTALITY WITHIN THE NEXT YEAR IS A REASONABLY FORESEEABLE CLINICAL OUTCOME, EVEN IF NOT CERTAIN.(C) SERIOUS ILLNESS.--A POLST IS NOT APPROPRIATE SIMPLY 20250SB0730PN1799 - 19 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 BECAUSE A PERSON IS SERIOUSLY ILL.(D) CONSTRUCTION.--NOTHING IN THIS SUBCHAPTER SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO ADVANCE OR SUPPORT EUTHANASIA, SUICIDE OR HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER-ASSISTED SUICIDE.§ 5495. Voluntary consent requirement.(a) Patient consent.--No POLST shall be valid without the voluntary consent of the patient or a surrogate decision maker.(b) Health insurance or coverage.--A health care insurer may not:(1) Require an individual to consent to a POLST or to have a POLST as a condition for being insured.(2) Charge an individual a different rate or fee whether or not the individual consents to, or has, a POLST.(3) Require a health care provider to have a policy to offer a POLST to any individual.(4) Provide a health care provider a financial incentive, payment, discount or rating incentive for having a policy or procedure relating to POLST completion.(5) Impose a rating or reimbursement penalty if a health care provider fails to achieve a target for POLST completions.(6) DENY, LIMIT, CONDITION, ALTER OR OTHERWISE AFFECT COVERAGE, REIMBURSEMENT, AUTHORIZATION OR TREATMENT DECISIONS BASED SOLELY ON THE PRESENCE OR ABSENCE OF A POLST, EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT THAT THE POLST CONSTITUTES A VALID MEDICAL ORDER DIRECTING OR LIMITING SPECIFIC TREATMENT CONSISTENT WITH APPLICABLE LAW.(c) Consultation.--Notwithstanding subsection (b), a health care provider may be paid for consultation with or counseling of a patient concerning a POLST or offering advance health care 20250SB0730PN1799 - 20 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 planning.(d) Health care provider and health care facility policies.--(1) A health care provider and a health care facility may not make consent to a POLST or having a POLST a condition of admission to, continued occupancy at, or the provision of health care services by the health care provider or a health care facility.(2) A health care provider and a health care facility may not provide a patient or surrogate decision maker an in-kind or financial incentive, payment or discount for consenting to or having a POLST.(3) In complying with paragraphs (1) and (2), a health care provider and a health care facility may have a policy to offer a POLST to appropriate individuals as part of a conversation about goals of care, personal values and preferences, benefits of various treatment options and avoiding unwanted burden.(4) A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER OR A HEALTH CARE FACILITY MAY NOT DENY, LIMIT, CONDITION, ALTER OR OTHERWISE PROVIDE DIFFERING LEVELS OF CARE TO AN INDIVIDUAL BASED SOLELY ON THE PRESENCE OR ABSENCE OF A POLST, EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT THAT THE LEVEL OF CARE IS EXPRESSLY DIRECTED OR LIMITED BY THE PATIENT AS SPECIFIED IN A VALID POLST.§ 5496. POLST Advisory Committee.(a) Appointment.--The secretary shall appoint a POLST Advisory Committee, including a chairperson and vice chairperson of the committee.(b) Role of committee.--The committee shall advise the department on POLST-related matters, including the format and 20250SB0730PN1799 - 21 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 content of the POLST form and education about POLST.(c) Composition.-- (1) After consulting Statewide organizations comprised of relevant stakeholders, the secretary shall appoint one or more representatives of the following to the committee:(i) The Pennsylvania Medical Society.(ii) The Hospital and Healthsystem Association of Pennsylvania.(iii) The Pennsylvania Homecare Association.(iv) The Pennsylvania Bar Association.(v) The Joint State Government Commission's Advisory Committee on Decedents' Estates Laws.(vi) Pennsylvania Emergency Health Services Council.(vii) Pennsylvania College of Emergency Physicians.(viii) Long-term care facilities and providers of long-term support.(ix) Patient advocates.(x) Disability rights advocates.(xi) Faith-based health care providers. (xii) Bioethicists, including both a secular and faith-based representative.(2) The secretary may appoint additional individuals to the committee to provide expertise and a broad representation of interests.(3) The secretary shall ensure that members appointed to the committee include individuals with knowledge about:(i) community POLST coalition efforts; and(ii) nationally accepted physician orders for life-sustaining treatment standards and educational resources, including the National POLST Paradigm Task Force.20250SB0730PN1799 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 5497. Administration of POLST program.(a) Duties.--The department shall perform the following duties in consultation with the committee:(1) Adopt and update a POLST form under section 5498 (relating to POLST form).(2) Develop and update basic education materials on POLST under section 5498.1 (relating to education about POLST).(3) Make the POLST form and its educational materials available and accessible through the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Plain language requirement.--In consultation with the committee, the department shall make the POLST form and its educational materials clear, concise, well-organized and otherwise understandable to patients, their families, other surrogate decision makers and health care providers.(c) Coordination.--In the performance of its responsibilities under this subchapter, the department shall coordinate with other State agencies that address the special needs of individuals with disabilities and older persons, including the Department of Aging and the Department of Human Services.§ 5498. POLST form.(a) Development and update.--In consultation with the committee, the department shall adopt, and periodically update when appropriate, a standard POLST form for health care practitioners to issue a POLST with the voluntary consent of the patient or an authorized surrogate decision maker.(b) Medical order options.--(1) The POLST form shall include options for a set of 20250SB0730PN1799 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 medical orders for cardiopulmonary resuscitation and other medical interventions that are determined to be appropriate for a POLST.(2) The POLST form shall be outcome neutral. The medical order options shall range from full treatment to comfort care only, with options in between.(3) The POLST form may include options for nutrition and hydration administered by gastric tube or intravenously or by other medically administered means. If the consent is provided by a surrogate decision maker, the following requirements shall apply:(i) Section 5456(c)(5)(iii) (relating to authority of health care agent).(ii) Section 5461(c) (relating to decisions by health care representative).(iii) Section 5462(c) (relating to duties of attending physician and health care provider).(4) Except as provided under section 5498.2(a)(2) (relating to requirements for valid POLST), no medical order option section shall be required to be completed for the POLST to be valid.(c) Notices.--(1) The POLST form shall clearly and conspicuously state that a POLST may only be issued with the voluntary consent of the patient or the patient's authorized surrogate decision maker and that a patient or surrogate decision maker may not be compelled by a health care provider or health care insurer to complete or sign a POLST.(2) The POLST form may include other notices regarding patient rights, health care practitioner responsibilities and 20250SB0730PN1799 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 availability of educational information which the department, in consultation with the committee, determines appropriate.(d) Identification and signatures.--(1) The POLST form shall provide for identification of the patient, any surrogate decision maker who consents to the POLST on behalf of the patient and the health care practitioner who issues the POLST.(2) The POLST form shall provide for the signatures of the patient, any surrogate decision maker and the health care practitioner who issues the POLST.(e) Instructions.--The POLST form shall include instructions for its completion. The instructions shall clearly convey the sections required to be completed for the POLST to be valid.(f) Opportunity for comment.-- (1) Prior to adopting the initial POLST form developed on or after the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall transmit to the Legislative Reference Bureau notice of the proposed form for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and provide an opportunity for comment on the proposed form for at least 60 days after publication of the notice. The following shall apply:(i) In addition to submitting for publication notice of the initial form in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin, the department shall serve a copy of the form to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(ii) Within 60 days after the close of the comment period, the department shall submit to the Legislative 20250SB0730PN1799 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin a subsequent notice that responds to each comment the department has received. In providing responses to each comment, the department shall indicate the reasons for adopting or rejecting the recommendations made during the comment period. The department shall submit to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin a final version of the POLST form, which the department shall also post on its publicly accessible Internet website.(2) The department shall comply with the procedures under paragraph (1) for updates to the POLST form.(3) The adoption of the initial POLST form and any subsequent updates to the POLST form shall be exempt from the following:(i) Article II of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(ii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iii) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act. (iv) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(g) POLST forms.--POLST forms executed prior to the effective date of this subsection shall be recognized as valid POLST forms and shall have full force and effect as if executed on or after the effective date of this subsection.20250SB0730PN1799 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) Printed copies.--The POLST form may not be required to be obtained exclusively from the department or any particular vendor. The department shall provide a process for the POLST form to be downloaded free of charge from a publicly accessible Internet website.§ 5498.1. Education about POLST.(a) Development and update of educational materials.--In consultation with the committee, the department shall develop and periodically update when appropriate educational materials about POLST for patients, surrogate decision makers, health care providers and the public.(b) Basic education.--The department shall make its basic educational materials available in alternative formats that are accessible to persons with a disability. The department's POLST educational materials shall include basic information that explains and provides guidance on the following:(1) The definition of a POLST, including the types of medical interventions that may be covered.(2) How a POLST is an immediately actionable medical order and is valid and portable across all patient settings.(3) When a POLST may be useful and appropriate and when a POLST may not be appropriate.(4) The differences between a POLST and an advance health care directive.(5) The voluntary consent requirement, including a patient's right to refuse to execute a POLST without adverse consequences under section 5495(b) and (d) (relating to voluntary consent requirement).(6) The importance of a shared decision-making process to assure understanding and voluntary consent by patients and 20250SB0730PN1799 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 surrogate decision makers.(7) When review of a POLST is required or recommended.(8) The obligation of health care providers to comply with a POLST under this subchapter.(9) Legal requirements for surrogate decision making.(10) Appropriate inclusion of patients, to the extent possible, regardless of the patient's physical or mental condition, in decision making when decisions are made on the patient's behalf by surrogate decision makers.(c) Training recommendations.--The department's educational materials shall include recommendations for training of health care practitioners and others who educate patients about POLST or assist in completion of a POLST form to assure that the practitioner or other individual has the practiced skills of those conversations and understands the applicable law, medical issues and treatments covered by a POLST. These materials shall incorporate information consistent with the findings in section 5492(9), (10), (11), (12), (13), (14), (15) and (16) (relating to legislative findings and intent).(d) Other resources.--The department may provide information about the availability of educational materials from other sources, including nonprofit organizations that provide education, training and resources for POLST programs. § 5498.2. Requirements for valid POLST.(a) Validity.--To be valid, a POLST shall require each of the following:(1) Use of the POLST form, except under sections 5498.5 (relating to copies of orders), 5498.15 (relating to POLST executed under prior POLST form), 5498.16 (relating to POLST executed under PLSWC form) and 5498.17 (relating to POLST 20250SB0730PN1799 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 executed in another state or jurisdiction).(2) Completion of the section regarding cardiopulmonary resuscitation.(3) Completion of the section documenting preferences regarding hospitalization and preferred level of care.(4) The date and signature of a health care practitioner in accordance with section 5498.6 (relating to signature options), except under subsection (b).(5) The date and signature of the patient or a surrogate decision maker in accordance with section 5498.6, except under subsection (c).(b) Verbal orders.--A verbal order is effective from the date given without countersignature until the expiration of the period of countersignature specified under paragraph (2) or (3). A health care practitioner's verbal order for a POLST shall be deemed to meet the requirements of subsection (a)(2) if all of the following requirements are met:(1) The order is entered for a patient receiving care from a health care facility.(2) The order is documented on the POLST form and countersigned by the health care practitioner in accordance with any applicable laws and regulations governing the health care facility, including a time frame in which the order must be countersigned.(3) No law or regulation governing the health care facility establishes a time limit in which the order must be countersigned, and the order is countersigned by the health care practitioner within seven days.(c) Verbal consent.--A surrogate decision maker's verbal consent for a POLST shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements 20250SB0730PN1799 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of subsection (a)(4) if all of the following requirements are met:(1) Obtaining the signature of the surrogate decision maker is not feasible in a timely manner.(2) The consent is documented on the POLST form by the health care facility in accordance with the health care facility's policies and procedures.(3) The signature of the surrogate decision maker is obtained as soon as feasible.(d) Effectiveness.--A POLST shall be effective on the date it meets the requirements of this section.§ 5498.3. Portability.(a) Validity.--A POLST executed in accordance with this subchapter shall be valid anywhere within this Commonwealth, including all health care facilities, the patient's residence and other care settings outside of a health care facility, and while the patient is in transit from one health care facility or care setting to another.(b) Authority of health care practitioners.--A POLST executed in accordance with this subchapter shall be valid in a health care facility regardless of whether the health care practitioner who signed the order has clinical privileges with the health care facility.(c) Other orders.--This subchapter does not prohibit a do-not-resuscitate or other order issued for care within a health care facility from being valid and actionable within that health care facility in accordance with the laws and regulations governing the health care facility.§ 5498.4. Team care.A health care facility may designate individuals who have 20250SB0730PN1799 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 been trained in a manner consistent with section 5498.1(c) (relating to education about POLST), including nurses and social workers, to participate in conversations with a patient or the patient's surrogate decision maker regarding a POLST or assisting in completion of the POLST form.§ 5498.5. Copies of orders.A copy of a POLST, including a photocopy, facsimile or other electronic copy, shall be as effective as the original POLST.§ 5498.6. Signature options.(a) Options.--A signature required by section 5498.2 (relating to requirements for valid POLST) may be provided by a hand-written signature or any other means allowed under this section.(b) Patient unable to sign.--If a patient is unable to sign by a written signature, it shall be sufficient for:(1) the patient to sign by a mark; or(2) another individual to sign for the patient if that patient specifically directs the other individual to sign the POLST for the patient.(c) Electronic signatures.--In the case of a patient receiving care from a health care facility, a signature on a POLST may be obtained by any electronic means that is authorized by the policies and procedures of the facility and is consistent with the laws governing the facility, including a digitized signature and a digital signature. A copy of the POLST shall show a representative image of the signature in the applicable signature field.§ 5498.7. Standards for surrogate decision makers.(a) Compliance.--When making a decision about a POLST on behalf of a patient, a surrogate decision maker shall comply 20250SB0730PN1799 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with all applicable legal requirements for health care decision making by a surrogate decision maker, including those provided under subsection (b), and the decisions of the surrogate decision maker are subject to all applicable legal restrictions on decisions by a surrogate decision maker.(b) Specific laws.--Surrogate decision makers must comply with the following:(1) Subchapter C (relating to health care agents and representatives), including:(i) Section 5456(c) (relating to authority of health care agent).(ii) Section 5461(c) (relating to decisions by health care representative).(iii) Section 5462(c) (relating to duties of attending physician and health care provider).(2) Chapter 55 (relating to incapacitated persons).(c) Minors.--A surrogate decision maker for an unemancipated minor shall be subject to the requirements and restrictions applicable to a health care representative for an adult when making a decision about a POLST on behalf of the minor.(d) Competent patient.--This section does not limit the right of a competent patient to consent to a POLST.§ 5498.8. Revocation.(a) Consent.--A patient or a surrogate decision maker acting within a decision-making authority may revoke consent to all or part of a POLST at any time and in any manner that communicates an intent to revoke.(b) Notice.--A health care provider or surrogate decision maker who is informed of a revocation shall promptly communicate the fact of the revocation to any attending health care provider 20250SB0730PN1799 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and to any health care facility from which the patient is receiving care.(c) Implementation.--A health care provider that is notified of a POLST revocation shall record that the POLST is void in any medical records containing the order that are maintained by the health care provider.§ 5498.9. Transfer requirements.(a) Notice of POLST.--A health care facility that transfers a patient with a POLST to another health care facility shall provide the POLST to the receiving facility and any health care providers who are responsible for the patient's care during transport to the receiving facility. The notice of the order shall be provided prior to the transfer, or, if prior notice is not feasible, as soon as feasible thereafter.(b) Compliance.--The requirements of section 5498.11 (relating to compliance) shall apply in the event that the receiving health care provider or health care provider involved in the transfer is unable in good conscience to comply with the POLST or the policies of the health care provider preclude compliance.§ 5498.10. Review requirements. (a) Mandatory review.--In the event a patient with a POLST is admitted or transferred to a health care facility, the treating health care provider at the health care facility shall review the POLST as soon as feasible with the patient or the patient's authorized surrogate decision maker. The POLST shall remain effective unless and until modified or voided as a result of the review.(b) Recommended review.--In consultation with the committee, the department shall develop recommendations for other 20250SB0730PN1799 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 situations in which it is appropriate or advisable for a POLST to be reviewed, giving consideration to the following circumstances:(1) A substantial change in the patient's health status.(2) A change in the patient's goals of care or treatment preferences.§ 5498.11. Compliance.(a) Notification by attending physician or health care provider.--If an attending physician or other health care provider cannot in good conscience comply with a POLST or if the policies of a health care provider preclude compliance with a POLST, the attending physician or health care provider shall so inform the patient, if the patient is competent, and any surrogate decision maker who consented to the order on behalf of the patient.(b) Transfer.--The attending physician or health care provider under subsection (a) shall make every reasonable effort to assist in the transfer of the patient to another physician or health care provider who will comply with the POLST.(c) Liability.--If transfer under subsection (b) is impossible, the provision of care necessary to sustain life to a patient may not subject an attending physician or a health care provider to criminal or civil liability or administrative sanction for failure to carry out the POLST.(d) Policies.--The department shall require health care facilities to have policies and procedures for implementation of a POLST.§ 5498.12. Emergency medical services.(a) Medical command instructions.--Notwithstanding the absence of a do-not-resuscitate order in a POLST, emergency 20250SB0730PN1799 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 medical services providers shall at all times comply with the instructions of an authorized medical command physician to withhold or discontinue resuscitation.(b) Effect of POLST do-not-resuscitate order.--(1) Emergency medical services providers shall comply with a do-not-resuscitate order in a POLST if made aware of the order. In order to be in compliance with the do-not-resuscitate order in a POLST, an emergency medical service provider must:(i) withhold cardiopulmonary resuscitation from the patient in the event of respiratory and cardiac arrest; or(ii) discontinue and cease cardiopulmonary resuscitation, in the event the emergency medical services provider is presented with a do-not-resuscitate order in a POLST after initiating cardiopulmonary resuscitation.(2) Emergency medical services providers shall provide other medical interventions necessary and appropriate to provide comfort and alleviate pain, including intravenous fluids, medications, oxygen and any other intervention appropriate to the level of the certification of the provider, unless otherwise directed by the patient or the emergency medical services provider's authorized medical command physician.(c) Uncertainty regarding validity or applicability of do- not-resuscitate order in POLST.--(1) Emergency medical services providers who in good faith are uncertain about the validity or applicability of a do-not-resuscitate order in a POLST shall render care in 20250SB0730PN1799 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with their level of certification. (2) Emergency medical services providers who act under paragraph (1) may not be subject to civil or criminal liability or administrative sanction for failure to comply with a do-not-resuscitate order in a POLST.(d) Uncertainty regarding validity or applicability of POLST.--Emergency medical services providers are not required to, but may if they deem it necessary, contact the medical command physician prior to complying with a POLST.§ 5498.13. Immunity.(a) Compliance.--A health care provider or other person may not be subject to civil or criminal liability or to discipline for unprofessional conduct for complying with a POLST based upon the good faith assumption that the orders therein were valid when made and have not been revoked or terminated.(b) Noncompliance.--A health care provider or other person may not be subject to civil or criminal liability or to discipline for unprofessional conduct for refusing to comply with a POLST on the good faith belief that:(1) The POLST is not valid.(2) Compliance with the POLST would be unethical or, to a reasonable degree of medical certainty, would result in medical care having no medical basis in addressing any medical need or condition of the patient, provided that the health care provider complies in good faith with sections 5462(c) (relating to duties of attending physician and health care provider) and 5498.11 (relating to compliance).(c) Other protection.--This section does not limit the immunity available to a health care provider or person under section 5431 (relating to liability) or 5498.12(c)(2) (relating 20250SB0730PN1799 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to emergency medical services).§ 5498.14. Conflict with advance health care directive. If a POLST conflicts with a provision of an advance health care directive, the provision of the instrument latest in date of execution shall prevail to the extent of the conflict.§ 5498.15. POLST executed under prior POLST form. A POLST executed on a POLST form that was valid when executed shall remain valid even if the department subsequently adopts a revised form.§ 5498.16. POLST executed under PLSWC form. (a) Validity.--Except as provided under subsection (b), a POLST executed on the PLSWC form prior to the adoption of a POLST form under this subchapter is effective to the same extent as it would be effective if executed on the POLST form.(b) Emergency medical services providers.--Emergency medical services providers are not required to, but may if they deem it necessary, contact the medical command physician prior to complying with a POLST executed on the PLSWC form.(c) Immunity.--For purposes of the immunity under sections 5431 (relating to liability) and 5498.13 (relating to immunity), a POLST executed on the PLSWC form shall be deemed to be a POLST executed under this subchapter.§ 5498.17. POLST executed in another state or jurisdiction.(a) Validity.--Except as provided under subsection (b), a health care provider may comply with a POLST, or its substantial equivalent executed under the laws of another state or jurisdiction and in conformity with the laws of that state or jurisdiction, if:(1) the order meets the requirements of section 5498.2(a)(2), (3) and (4) (relating to requirements for valid 20250SB0730PN1799 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 POLST); and(2) the health care provider consults, as soon as feasible, with the patient if competent and any surrogate decision maker regarding continued compliance with the order.(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) may not apply to orders executed in another state or jurisdiction to the extent that the order directs procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of procedures under circumstances that are inconsistent with the laws of this Commonwealth, including section 5498.7 (relating to standards for surrogate decision makers).(c) Immunity.--For purposes of the immunity under sections 5431 (relating to liability) and 5498.13 (relating to immunity), a POLST, or its substantial equivalent that was executed under the laws of another state or jurisdiction and is valid under subsections (a) and (b), shall be deemed to be a POLST executed under this subchapter.§ 5498.18. POLST registry study.(a) Study.--In consultation with the committee and the Pennsylvania eHealth Partnership Authority, the department shall study the feasibility and cost of creating an Internet-based POLST registry that would allow health care providers caring for a patient to obtain a current POLST for the patient.(b) Report.--The department shall report the results of the study to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the Health Committee of the House of Representatives. The department shall report the status of the study to the committees at least every 180 days until the final results are reported.Section 7. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following provisions shall take effect 20250SB0730PN1799 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 immediately:The addition of 20 Pa.C.S. § 5496.This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0730PN1799 - 39 - 12345